Georgia, session 2025_26, SB259.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as "Ridge's Law."
S. B. 259
- 1 -

LC 57 0260S (SCS)
SECTION 2.
Chapter 11 of Title 15 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to the Juvenile
Code, is amended in Article 3, relating to dependency proceedings, by revising subsection (b)
of Code Section 15-11-131, relating to temporary protective custody of child by physician
without court order and without parental consent and immunity, as follows:
"(b) A physician holding a child in temporary protective custody shall:
(1) Make reasonable and diligent efforts to inform the child's parents, guardian, or legal
custodian of the whereabouts of such child and the right to obtain an independent medical
evaluation or pediatric specialty consultation as provided for under Code
Section 15-11-131.1;
(2) As soon as possible, make a report of the suspected abuse or neglect which caused
him or her to take temporary custody of the child and inform DFCS of the basis of his or
her determinations, including whether a physical examination was conducted and what
medical records were reviewed, and that such child has been held in temporary custody;
and
(3) Not later than 24 hours after such child is held in temporary custody:
(A) Contact a juvenile court intake officer, and inform such intake officer that such
child is in imminent danger to his or her life or health as a result of suspected abuse or
neglect; or
(B) Contact a law enforcement officer who shall take such child and promptly bring
such child before a juvenile court intake officer."
SECTION 3.
Said chapter is further amended in said article by adding a new Code section to read as
follows:
S. B. 259
- 2 -

LC 57 0260S (SCS)
"15-11-131.1.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term 'pediatric specialty consultation' means a
consultation with a physician licensed to practice medicine in this state and board certified
in the relevant pediatric field or specialty, including radiology, genetics, orthopedics,
endocrinology, neurosurgery, child abuse pediatrics, gastroenterology, surgery, or forensic
pathology, and to diagnose and treat certain health conditions, including rickets,
Ehlers-Danlos syndrome, osteogenesis imperfecta, vitamin D deficiency, or other medical
conditions related to the differential diagnosis of child abuse or neglect.
(b) Any parent or legal guardian of a child who is taken into temporary protective custody
pursuant to Code Section 15-11-131 shall have the right to obtain an independent medical
evaluation or pediatric specialty consultation of such child at his or her own expense unless
prohibited by court order. Physicians and medical professionals, law enforcement officers,
and DFCS shall cooperate as may reasonably be necessary to facilitate an independent
medical evaluation or pediatric specialty consultation for such child.
(c) At any hearing concerning a child before the court in a dependency proceeding
pursuant to this article, the court shall consider the results from an independent medical
evaluation or pediatric specialty consultation of such child.
(d) No adjudication hearing scheduled in accordance with Part 8 of this article shall be
continued solely because the results from an independent medical evaluation or pediatric
specialty consultation of the child before the court are unavailable."
SECTION 4.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval and shall apply to any legal action filed on or after such effective date.
SECTION 5.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 259
- 3 -